Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202281-12,190
Application; valid; when.

Any complete application shall be considered a valid application on the date submitted for the purposes of the Nebraska Transformational Projects Act.

Laws 2020, LB1107, § 106.